Utah statutes.
62A-2-109.   License application -- Classification of information.
(1)  An application for a license under this chapter shall be made to the
office and shall contain information that is necessary to comply with approved
rules.
(2)  Information received by the office through reports and inspections shall
be classified in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records
Access and Management Act.
